test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-viissad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - viiššâđ: # MLchecked

    viiššâđ+V+Inf: [viššâđ, viiššâđ]
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: viššuđ
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viššuum
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viššuuh
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viššoo
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viššojeen
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viššuuvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viššuv
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viššup
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viššuuvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viššojeh
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viššojim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viššojih
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viššui
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viššuim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viššuid
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: viššuin
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viššuim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viššuid
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viššojii
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: viššuuččim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: viššuuččih
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: viššuuččij
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: viššuuččáim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: viššuuččáid
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: viššuuččáin
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: viššuuččijm
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: viššuuččijd
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: viššuuččii
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: viššuužeem
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: viššuužeeh
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viššuš
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: viššuužeen
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: viššušvettee
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: viššuužává
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: viššuužep
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viššušvetteđ
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: viššuužeh
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viššuu
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viššum # viiššum, no other verb had VV
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: viššuuččii
#    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: viššuužii
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [viššojeijee, viššojijjee]
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [viššum, viiššum]
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: viššum
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: viššuumin
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: viššuumist
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: viššuumân
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: viššuudijn
    viiššâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: viššuuhánnáá
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: višâdâm
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: višâdah
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viišâd
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: višâdeen
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viišâdvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: višâdává
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: višâdeh
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viišâd
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: višâdim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: višâdij
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: višâdii
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: višâdiččim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: višâdičij
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: višâdižžeem
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: višâdiš
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viišâd
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: višâdâm
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: višâdižžii
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: višâdâm
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: viišâdhánnáá
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: višâdem
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: viišâdmân
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: viišâdmin
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: viišâdmist
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: viišâddijn
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: viišâddijnân
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: viišâddijnâd
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: viišâddijnis
    viiššâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: viišâddijn
    viiššâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: višâstâm
    viiššâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: višâttâm
    viiššâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: višâškuáđám
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: viššâliđ
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viššâlâm # liđ ok but does not sound natural
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viššâl
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viššâleen
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viššâleh
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viššâl
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viššâlim
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viššâlij
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viššâlii
